Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2807
Ordinance; form; publication; emergency.

The style of ordinances shall be: "Be it ordained by the council of the municipal county of ................," and all ordinances of a general nature shall, within fifteen days after they are passed, be published in one or more newspapers in general circulation within the municipal county, or in pamphlet form, to be distributed or sold, as may be provided by ordinance. Every ordinance fixing a penalty or forfeiture for its violation shall, before the same takes effect, be published for at least one week in one or more newspapers in general circulation within the municipal county. In cases of riots, infectious diseases, or other impending danger, or any other emergency requiring its immediate operation, such ordinance shall take effect upon the proclamation of the council immediately upon its first publication.

Laws 2001, LB 142, § 7.